Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1729
Sales agent; register information; bond.

A sales agent, including the developer if it is also the sales agent, shall register with the commission the time-share program or programs that it is selling, its principal office address and telephone number, and designate who its responsible managing employee is and any special escrow accounts set up for the deposit and collection of purchasers' funds. The sales agent shall furnish evidence that a bond of five thousand dollars has been placed with a surety company or a cash bond with the commission to cover any defalcations of the sales agent.

Laws 1980, LB 945, § 29.